Maryland, session 2026, HB0662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–205.
(b) (1) (i) The county governing body shall provide sufficient funding to
meet the minimum compensation levels required under this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0662*

HOUSE BILL 662
(ii) Within the limits authorized by the county governing body, a
local board may fix the compensation of election judges above the minimum compensation
levels required under this section.
(2) A local board shall pay an election judge for:
(i) subject to paragraph (4)(ii) of this subsection, each course of
instruction required under § 10–206(g)(1) of this subtitle that the election judge completes;
and
(ii) each election day and each early voting day that the election
judge actually serves.
(3) (i) For each election judge who is not a returning election judge, the
compensation for each election day and each early voting day actually served shall be at
least $250 per day.
(ii) For each returning election judge, the compensation for each
election day and each early voting day actually served shall be at least $100 more per day
than the compensation provided to an election judge who is not a returning election judge.
(4) (i) The compensation for each completed course of instruction
required under § 10–206(g)(1) of this subtitle shall be at least $50.
(ii) A local board shall pay an election judge the compensation
required under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection only after the election judge actually
serves an election day or early voting day.
(d) For service as an election judge, a public school student in the State may
BOTH:
(1) earn hours toward the service–learning requirement for graduation
under COMAR 13A.03.02.05; [or] AND
(2) receive the election judge compensation under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.